Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201458-824
Authority; office; location.

The authority
may maintain an office at such place or places within Nebraska as it may designate.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 21;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2921;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 21;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1721;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 24.